Hawaii statutes.
§11-1.6 Appointment of the chief election
officer; requirements; term; restrictions; salary; reappointment; removal.
(a) The chief election officer shall be appointed by the elections commission,
without regard to chapter 76. The appointment shall not be subject to the
advice and consent of the senate. In the event of a vacancy, the elections
commission shall meet expeditiously to select and appoint a new chief election
officer to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

(b) The person appointed to be chief election
officer shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of the State, and a
registered voter of the State.

(c) The chief election officer shall serve for
a term of four years. The term shall begin on February 1 following the appointment.

(d) The chief election officer shall devote
full time to the duties of the office and shall hold no other public office
during the individual's term of office. Except for exercising the right to
vote, the individual shall not support, advocate, or aid in the election or
defeat of any candidate for public office. The chief election officer shall
refrain from financial and business dealings that tend to reflect adversely on
the individual's impartiality, interfere with the proper performance of election
duties, or exploit the individual's position. Subject to the requirements
above, the individual may hold and manage investments, including real estate,
and engage in other remunerative activity, but shall not serve as an officer,
director, manager, advisor, or employee of any business.

(e) The chief election officer shall be paid a
salary not to exceed eighty-seven per cent of the salary of the director of
human resources development.

(f) The chief election officer may petition
the elections commission for reappointment. The elections commission may
reappoint an incumbent chief election officer based on the performance of the
chief election officer. The elections commission may authorize the chief
election officer to hold office until a successor is appointed.

(g) The chief election officer is an at-will
employee. The elections commission shall provide written notification of any
removal and state the reason for the removal. [L Sp 1995, c 27, pt of §2, §15;
am L 1999, c 141, §§3, 6; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2002, c 16, §1; am L
2003, c 117, §1; am L 2004, c 57, §9; am L 2005, c 226, §2; am L 2015, c 173,
§1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next